Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. Time for Service; Return

§§ 771-775.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 776.
Repealed.
1969, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 1970.

§ 777.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 778.
Repealed.
1967, No. 233 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 2, 1968.

§ 779.
Repealed.
1969, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 1970.

§ 780.
Indorsement of fees.

The officer serving process shall indorse thereon his or her fees and charges and the number of miles actually and necessarily traveled in the performance of his or her duty in serving the same, otherwise his or her fees shall not be allowed.